Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20262-505
Cultivation and transportation of hemp; authorized.

(1) Hemp may be cultivated in this state by a USDA-licensed hemp producer, in accordance with such producer's USDA-issued license, or by a state-program-licensed hemp producer, in accordance with such producer's license under a USDA-approved tribal program.

(2) Hemp may only be transported pursuant to section 2-515.

Laws 2019, LB657, § 5;

Laws 2020, LB1152, § 3;

Laws 2024, LB262, § 3.